nb: Inkluderte komponenter i sett: Kjede + styringer; Kjede + styringer + strammer; Kjede + strammer; Kun kjede; Komplett registerkjedesett (kjede; Inkluderer bolter/monteringsmateriell; Inkluderer kamakseljusterere (VVT-komponenter); Inkluderer tetninger/pakninger; Inkluderer tannhjul/drev; Annet / se beskrivelse; styringer; tannhjul); strammer; Annet
hr-HR: Uključene komponente kompleta: Lanac + vodilice; Lanac + vodilice + zatezač; Lanac + zatezač; Samo lanac; Potpuni komplet za razvodni mehanizam (lanac; Uključuje vijke/okove; Uključuje fazere bregastog vratila (komponente VVT); Uključuje brtve/brtvila; Uključuje lančanike/zupčanike; Ostalo / pogledajte opis; vodilice; lančanici); zatezač; Ostalo
fr: Composants du kit inclus: Chaîne et guides; Chaîne, guides et tendeur; Chaîne et tendeur; Chaîne uniquement; Kit de distribution complet (chaîne; Comprend des boulons/de la quincaillerie; Comprend des déphaseurs d’arbre à cames (composants VVT); Comprend des joints; Comprend des pignons/engrenages; Autre/voir la description; guides; pignons); tendeur; Autre
sk-SK: Vrátane súčastí súpravy: Reťaz + vodiace lišty; Reťaz + vodiace lišty + napínač; Reťaz + napínač; Iba reťaz; Kompletná rozvodová súprava (reťaz; Zahŕňa skrutky/kovanie; Zahŕňa fázovače vačkového hriadeľa (komponenty VVT); Zahŕňa tesnenia; Zahŕňa reťazové kolesá/ozubené kolesá; Iné/pozri popis; vodiace lišty; reťazové kolesá); napínač; Iné
de: Im Set enthaltene Komponenten: Kette + Führungen; Kette + Führungen + Spanner; Kette + Spanner; Nur Kette; Komplettes Steuerketten-Paket (Kette; Mit Schrauben/Befestigungsmaterial; Mit Nockenwellenverstellern (VVT-Komponenten); Mit Dichtungen; Mit Kettenrädern/Zahnrädern; Sonstige/siehe Beschreibung; Führungen; Kettenräder); Spanner; Sonstige
it: Componenti del kit inclusi: Catena e guide; Catena, guide e tenditore; Catena e tenditore; Solo catena; Kit di distribuzione completo (catena; Include bulloni/minuteria; Include variatori di fase (componenti VVT); Include guarnizioni/tenute; Include pignoni/ingranaggi; Altro/vedi descrizione; guide; pignoni); tenditore; Altro
ko: 키트 구성품 포함: 체인 및 가이드; 체인, 가이드 및 텐셔너; 체인 및 텐셔너; 체인 전용; 전체 타이밍 키트(체인; 볼트/하드웨어 포함; 캠 페이저 포함(VVT 구성 요소); 씰/가스켓 포함; 스프로킷/기어 포함; 기타/설명 참조; 가이드; 스프로킷); 텐셔너; 기타
ja: キットコンポーネント付き: チェーン + ガイド; チェーン + ガイド + テンショナー; チェーン + テンショナー; チェーンのみ; フルタイミングキット (チェーン; ボルト/金具を含む; カムフェイザー (VVT コンポーネント) を含む; シール/ガスケットを含む; スプロケット/ギアを含む; その他/詳細を参照; ガイド; スプロケット); テンショナー; その他
zh-TW: 包含套件組件: 鍊條 + 導軌; 鍊條 + 導軌 + 張緊器; 鍊條 + 張緊器; 僅鍊條; 全套正時套件 (鍊條; 包含螺栓/硬體; 包含凸輪軸相位器 (VVT 組件); 包含密封件/墊片; 包含鏈輪/齒輪; 其他/請參閱說明; 導軌; 鏈輪); 張緊器; 其他
vi: Các thành phần đi kèm trong bộ dụng cụ: Xích + đường dẫn hướng; Xích + đường dẫn hướng + bộ căng xích; Xích + bộ căng xích; Chỉ có xích; Trọn bộ đặt cam (xích; Kèm theo bu-lông/phụ tùng; Kèm theo cơ cấu định pha trục cam (phụ tùng VVT); Kèm theo phớt/gioăng; Kèm theo nhông đĩa/bánh răng; Khác/xem mô tả; đường dẫn hướng; nhông đĩa); bộ căng xích; Khác
cs: Součásti sady v balení: Řetěz + vodítka; Řetěz + vodítka + napínák; Řetěz + napínák; Pouze řetěz; Kompletní rozvodová sada (řetěz; Obsahuje šrouby/spojovací materiál; Obsahuje fázovače vačky (komponenty VVT); Obsahuje těsnění; Obsahuje řetězová/ozubená kola; Jiné / viz popis; vodítka; řetězová kola); napínák; Jiné
sl-SI: Vključeni sestavni deli kompleta: Veriga + vodila; Veriga + vodila + napenjalnik; Veriga + napenjalnik; Samo veriga; Popoln komplet za krmiljenje (veriga; Vključuje vijake/okovje; Vključuje fazne regulatorje odmikačev (komponente VVT); Vključuje tesnila; Vključuje verižnike/zobnike; Drugo/glejte opis; vodila; verižniki); napenjalnik; Drugo
ro-RO: Componente incluse în kit: Lanț + ghidaje; Lanț + ghidaje + întinzător; Lanț + întinzător; Doar lanț; Kit de distribuție complet (lanț; Include șuruburi/feronerie; Include defazoare ax cu came (componente VVT); Include inele de etanșare/garnituri; Include pinioane/roți dințate; Altele/vezi descrierea; ghidaje; pinioane); întinzător; Altele
tr: Fırın pişirme atmosferi: Zincir ve kılavuzlar; Zincir, kılavuzlar ve gergi; Zincir ve gergi; Yalnızca zincir; Tam zamanlama kiti (zincir; Cıvata/donanım dahildir; Kam fazlayıcıları dahildir (VVT bileşenleri); Contalar/sızdırmazlık elemanları dahildir; Dişliler/çarklar dahildir; Diğer/açıklamaya bakın; kılavuzlar; dişliler); gergi; Diğer
ru: Состав комплекта: Цепь + направляющие; Цепь + направляющие + натяжитель; Цепь + натяжитель; Только цепь; Полный комплект ГРМ (цепь; Включает болты/крепеж; Включает фазорегуляторы (компоненты VVT); Включает сальники/прокладки; Включает звездочки/шестерни; Другое/см. описание; направляющие; звездочки); натяжитель; Другое
hu: Fő tartozék komponensek: Lánc és vezetők; Lánc, vezetők és feszítő; Lánc és feszítő; Csak lánc; Teljes vezérműkészlet (lánc; Csavarokat/kötőelemeket tartalmaz; Vezérműtengely-állítókat (VVT komponenseket) tartalmaz; Tömítéseket tartalmaz; Lánckerekeket/fogaskerekeket tartalmaz; Egyéb / lásd a leírást; vezetők; lánckerekek); feszítő; Egyéb
da: Sætkomponenter medfølger: Kæde og styr; Kæde, styr og strammer; Kæde og strammer; Kun kæde; Komplet taktkædesæt (kæde; Inkluderer bolte/beslag; Inkluderer knastakselfasere (VVT-komponenter); Inkluderer tætninger/pakninger; Inkluderer tandhjul/gear; Andet/se beskrivelse; styr; tandhjul); strammer; Andet
el: Περιλαμβάνονται εξαρτήματα κιτ: Αλυσίδα + οδηγοί; Αλυσίδα + οδηγοί + εντατήρας; Αλυσίδα + εντατήρας; Μόνο αλυσίδα; Πλήρες κιτ χρονισμού (αλυσίδα; Περιλαμβάνει βίδες/εξοπλισμό; Περιλαμβάνει γρανάζια εκκεντροφόρων (εξαρτήματα VVT); Περιλαμβάνει τσιμούχες/φλάντζες; Περιλαμβάνει γρανάζια/οδοντωτούς τροχούς; Άλλο/δείτε περιγραφή; οδηγοί; γρανάζια); εντατήρας; Άλλο
bg-BG: Включени компоненти в комплекта: Верига + водачи; Верига + водачи + обтегач; Верига + обтегач; Само верига; Пълен ангренажен комплект (верига; Включва болтове/крепежни елементи; Включва фазорегулатори (VVT компоненти); Включва уплътнения/гарнитури; Включва зъбни колела; Друго/вижте описанието; водачи; зъбни колела); обтегач; Друго
th: ส่วนประกอบในชุดอุปกรณ์: โซ่ + รางประคอง; โซ่ + รางประคอง + ตัวดันโซ่; โซ่ + ตัวดันโซ่; โซ่เท่านั้น; ชุดไทม์มิ่งครบชุด (โซ่; มีนอต/ฮาร์ดแวร์; มีแคมเฟสเซอร์ (ส่วนประกอบ VVT); มีซีล/ปะเก็น; มีสเตอร์/เกียร์; อื่นๆ/ดูคำอธิบาย; รางประคอง; สเตอร์); ตัวดันโซ่; อื่นๆ
en: Kit components included: Chain + guides; Chain + guides + tensioner; Chain + tensioner; Chain only; Full timing kit (chain; Includes bolts/hardware; Includes cam phasers (VVT components); Includes seals/gaskets; Includes sprockets/gears; Other/see description; guides; sprockets); tensioner; Other
fi: Laitteiston sisältämät komponentit: Ketju ja ohjaimet; Ketju, ohjaimet ja kiristin; Ketju ja kiristin; Vain ketju; Täydellinen jakopääsarja (ketju; Sisältää pultit/kiinnikkeet; Sisältää nokka-akselin ajoittimet (VVT-osat); Sisältää tiivisteet; Sisältää ketjupyörät/rattaat; Muu / katso kuvaus; ohjaimet; ketjupyörät); kiristin; Muu
nl: Inbegrepen kitonderdelen: Ketting + geleiders; Ketting + geleiders + spanner; Ketting + spanner; Alleen ketting; Volledige distributieset (ketting; Inclusief bouten/hardware; Inclusief nokkenasverstellers (VVT-onderdelen); Inclusief afdichtingen/pakkingen; Inclusief tandwielen; Anders/zie beschrijving; geleiders; tandwielen); spanner; Anders
es: Componentes incluidos en el kit: Cadena y guías; Cadena, guías y tensor; Cadena y tensor; Solo cadena; Kit de distribución completo (cadena; Incluye tornillos/herrajes; Incluye variadores de fase (componentes VVT); Incluye sellos/juntas; Incluye piñones/engranajes; Otro/ver descripción; guías; piñones); tensor; Otro
pl: Dołączono elementy zestawu: Łańcuch + prowadnice; Łańcuch + prowadnice + napinacz; Łańcuch + napinacz; Tylko łańcuch; Pełny zestaw rozrządu (łańcuch; Zawiera śruby/osprzęt; Zawiera wariatory faz rozrządu (komponenty VVT); Zawiera uszczelnienia/uszczelki; Zawiera zębatki/koła zębate; Inne/zobacz opis; prowadnice; koła łańcuchowe); napinacz; Inne
pt-PT: Componentes incluídos no kit: Corrente e guias; Corrente, guias e tensor; Corrente e tensor; Apenas corrente; Kit de distribuição completo (corrente; Inclui parafusos/ferragens; Inclui desfasadores de cames (componentes VVT); Inclui vedantes/juntas; Inclui rodas dentadas/engrenagens; Outro/ver descrição; guias; rodas dentadas); tensor; Outro
lt-LT: Į rinkinį įeinantys komponentai: Grandinė ir kreipikliai; Grandinė, kreipikliai ir įtempėjas; Grandinė ir įtempėjas; Tik grandinė; Pilnas paskirstymo rinkinys (grandinė; Su varžtais / tvirtinimo detalėmis; Su paskirstymo velenėlių faziatoriais (VVT komponentais); Su riebokšliais / tarpinėmis; Su žvaigždutėmis / krumpliaračiais; Kita / žr. aprašymą; kreipikliai; žvaigždutės); įtempėjas; Kita
pt-BR: Componentes do kit inclusos: Corrente + guias; Corrente + guias + tensionador; Corrente + tensionador; Apenas corrente; Kit completo de distribuição (corrente; Inclui parafusos/ferragens; Inclui polias do comando (componentes VVT); Inclui retentores/juntas; Inclui coroas/engrenagens; Outros/ver descrição; guias; coroas); tensionador; Outros
zh-CN: 包括套装组件: 链条 + 导轨; 链条 + 导轨 + 张紧器; 链条 + 张紧器; 仅链条; 完整正时套件（链条; 含螺栓/五金件; 含凸轮轴相位器（VVT 组件）; 含密封件/垫片; 含链轮/齿轮; 其他/参阅说明; 导轨; 链轮）; 张紧器; 其他
sv: Medföljande komponenter i setet: Kedja + styrningar; Kedja + styrningar + spännare; Kedja + spännare; Endast kedja; Komplett kamkedjesats (kedja; Inkluderar bultar/monteringsdetaljer; Inkluderar kamfasare (VVT-komponenter); Inkluderar tätningar/packningar; Inkluderar kedjehjul/kugghjul; Övrigt/se beskrivning; styrningar; kedjehjul); spännare; Övrigt